Hawaii statutes.
[§39A-268] Status of special purpose
revenue bonds under Uniform Commercial Code. Notwithstanding any of the
provisions of this part or any recitals in any special purpose revenue bonds
issued under this part, all special purpose revenue bonds shall be deemed to be
investment securities under the Uniform Commercial Code, chapter 490, subject
only to the provisions of the special purpose revenue bonds pertaining to
registration. [L 2002, c 257, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next